Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 4 GENERAL REGULATIONS
30-15-401.4. Regulations to prevent the operation of illicit massage businesses - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Illicit massage businesses present a facade of legitimate services, concealing that the primary business is the sex and labor trafficking of victims who are trapped in these businesses;

Human trafficking is a growing problem throughout Colorado;

Cities in Colorado already have the authority to enact ordinances to establish licensing authorities to regulate massage businesses and to deter and shut down illicit massage businesses;

Counties in Colorado currently do not have the authority to enact ordinances to establish licensing authorities to regulate massage businesses and to deter and shut down illicit massage businesses;

It is critical for effective local enforcement against human trafficking that cities and counties work together against this increasing criminal activity;

Local licensing authorities are encouraged to report to the department of regulatory agencies information regarding criminal activities involving licensed massage therapists;

Most licensed massage therapists in Colorado are practicing lawfully and ethically; and

The intent of the general assembly is not to make the practice of lawful massage therapy more difficult for licensed massage therapists in Colorado.

The general assembly finds, therefore, that a county may adopt a local resolution or ordinance to establish business licensure requirements to regulate massage facilities or to regulate and prohibit unlawful activities for the sole purpose of deterring illicit massage businesses and preventing human trafficking.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Advertise" means to publish, display, or disseminate information and includes, but is not limited to, the issuance of any card, sign, or direct mail, or causing or permitting any sign or marking on or in any building or structure or in any newspaper, magazine, or directory, or any announcement or display via any televised, computerized electronic, or telephonic networks or media.

"Erotic parlor" means a facility that entices clients through advertising or other business practices directed towards sexual desire, lust, or passion.

"Fully clothed" means fully opaque, nontransparent material that must not expose an employee's genitalia or substantially expose the employee's undergarments.

"Illicit massage business" means a business that may provide massage but engages in human trafficking-related offenses, as described in sections 18-3-503 and 18-3-504.

"Licensing authority" means the governing body of the board of county commissioners of a county, or any authority designated by county charter or county resolution.

"Massage" or "massage therapy" has the same meaning as defined in section 12-235-104 (4).

"Massage facility" means any place of business where massage therapy or full body massage is practiced or administered.

"Massage therapist" has the same meaning as defined in section 12-235-104 (5).

"Person" means a natural person, partnership, association, company, corporation, or organization or managing agent, servant, officer, partner, owner, operator, or employee of any of them.

"Solo practitioner" means a licensed massage therapist, as defined in section 12-235-104 (5), performing the practice of massage therapy independently.

"Table shower" means an apparatus for the bathing or massaging of a person on a table or in a tub.

In addition to any other powers, a board of county commissioners may adopt a resolution or ordinance to establish business licensure requirements or to regulate and prohibit unlawful activities to prevent the operation of illicit massage businesses that engage in human trafficking-related offenses as described in sections 18-3-503 and 18-3-504. If a board of county commissioners adopts a resolution or ordinance to establish business licensure requirements pursuant to subsection (4) of this section or to prohibit unlawful activities pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, the resolution or ordinance must not be more restrictive than the requirements set forth in this section.

Counties that adopt a resolution or ordinance pursuant to this section shall consult with the cities within the county.

If a board of county commissioners adopts a resolution or ordinance to establish business licensure requirements for massage facilities as set forth in subsection (3)(a) of this section, the business licensure requirements may only include:

Requiring that a massage facility obtain a license prior to opening for business and operating as a massage facility;

Requiring a reasonable administrative fee not to exceed one hundred and fifty dollars for issuing or renewing licensure applications. The fee must not be based on the number of employees. This subsection (4)(a)(II) applies only to new businesses applying for a license or renewal on or after August 10, 2022. Businesses that hold a license before the effective date of this act are exempt from the administrative fees described in this subsection (4)(a)(II).

Designating a licensing authority to receive, review, approve, or deny applications;

Allowing a licensing authority or a licensing authority's designee to deny an application only if:

The required administrative fee is not paid;

The county zoning or subdivision regulations do not allow for the operation of a massage facility;

The applicant has been convicted of or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere that is accepted by the court for a felony or misdemeanor for prostitution, as described in section 18-7-201; solicitation of a prostitute, as described in section 18-7-202; a human trafficking-related offense, as described in section 18-3-503 or 18-3-504; money laundering, as described in section 18-5-309; or similar crimes;

The applicant is registered as a sex offender or is required by law to register as a sex offender, as described in section 16-22-103;

The applicant has a pending criminal action that involves or is related to the offenses described in subsection (4)(a)(IV)(C) or (4)(a)(IV)(D) of this section; or

The applicant has one or more previous revocations or suspensions of a license to operate a massage facility.

Allowing a licensing authority or a licensing authority's designee the discretion to deny an application after considering, in accordance with section 24-5-101, an applicant's conviction of or plea of guilty or nolo contendere that is accepted by the court for a felony or a misdemeanor for fraud or theft or embezzlement, as described in section 18-4-401;

Requiring licensees to maintain a list of employees on site with the start date of employment, full legal name, date of birth, home address, telephone number, and employment position of each employee;

Requiring licensees and employees to have valid government identification, including but not limited to a form of identification described in section 24-21-521 (4)(a) and, for licensed massage therapists, a form of identification required for licensed massage therapists as described in section 24-34-107 (1), that must be immediately presented to a licensing authority or the licensing authority's designees upon request;

Requiring licensed massage therapists to maintain copies of valid massage therapy licensure, as required by article 235 of title 12, that must be immediately presented to a licensing authority, the licensing authority's designees, or law enforcement upon request;

Requiring licensees to maintain a complete set of records, which may include accounts, invoices, payroll, employment records, and a log book of all massage therapy administered at the massage facility. The log book must include, but need not be limited to, the date, time, and type of massage therapy administered, and the name of the massage therapist administering the massage therapy. The licensee shall retain the records in the log book for a minimum of one year following the administration of massage therapy. Local law enforcement or the licensing authority, or the licensing authority's designee, may inspect the set of records during business hours.

Designating the licensing authority, or the licensing authority's designees, responsible for the enforcement of the resolution or ordinance;

Setting penalties for the violation of prohibited activities as described in subsection (5) of this section; and

Granting a licensing authority, or licensing authority's designees, the authority to revoke or suspend a license for violating prohibited acts pursuant to subsection (5) of this section. A licensing authority, or the licensing authority's designees, may temporarily suspend a license with a hearing to be scheduled within fifteen days when the licensing authority finds:

The licensee willfully failed to disclose any information on the application as required;

The licensee knowingly permitted a person who does not hold a valid license pursuant to section 12-235-107 to perform massage therapy;

A pattern of activity that the massage facility is committing human trafficking-related offenses, as described in sections 18-3-503 and 18-3-504; and

The licensee failed to permit an inspection at a time the massage facility was open for business.

The licensing authority may issue a temporary massage facility license upon receipt of a completed massage facility license application involving the sale or change of ownership in a business. The temporary massage facility license is valid for thirty days, and the licensing authority shall renew the temporary massage facility license every thirty days until approval or denial of the massage facility license.

In investigating the fitness of any applicant, licensee, or employee or the agent of the licensee or applicant pursuant to subsection (4)(a)(III) of this section, the county sheriff's office shall conduct a background check on the applicant's or licensee's criminal history record and provide the local licensing authority, or the licensing authority's designee, information to determine whether the applicant or licensee is approved or denied for a license based on the criminal history record information. In the event the licensing authority takes into consideration information concerning the applicant's or licensee's criminal history record, the licensing authority shall also consider any information provided by the applicant or licensee regarding the criminal history, including, but not limited to, evidence of mitigating factors, rehabilitation, character references, and educational achievements, especially the mitigating factors pertaining to the period of time between the applicant's last criminal conviction and the consideration of the applicant's application for a license or renewal.

A licensing authority, or the licensing authority's designee, may report information to the department of regulatory agencies regarding criminal activity involving a licensed massage therapist.

A board of county commissioners may adopt a resolution or ordinance to prohibit activities to prevent the operation of illicit massage businesses that engage in human trafficking-related offenses as described in sections 18-3-503 and 18-3-504. Prohibited activities include:

Allowing a person who does not hold a massage therapy license pursuant to section 12-235-107 to perform massage in a massage facility;

Advertising to a prospective client that services, including prostitution, sexual acts, escort services, sexual services, or services related to human trafficking disguised as legitimate services, are available;

Permitting sexual acts or sexual services within or near a massage facility or in relation to massage therapy;

Denying inspection of a massage facility by law enforcement or inspectors of a licensing authority;

Refusing, interfering with, or eluding immediate identification of employees of the massage facility to law enforcement or a licensing authority's appointed inspectors;

Failing to immediately report to law enforcement any act of sexual misconduct occurring in a massage facility;

Allowing an employee or contractor of a massage facility to provide massage therapy without being fully clothed;

Requiring client nudity as part of a massage without the client's prior consent;

Allowing a massage facility to be open and practicing massage therapy without a licensed massage therapist on the premises;

Permitting a person in a massage facility to make an agreement with an employee or contractor to engage in any prostitution-related offense in the massage facility or any other location;

Permitting a massage facility to be used for housing, sheltering, or harboring any person, or as living or sleeping quarters for any person; except that an owner and the owner's family members who operate a massage facility as a home business are exempt from the prohibited activity in this subsection (5)(k); and

Operating an erotic parlor on the premises of a massage facility.

If authorized by the county resolution or ordinance, a law enforcement officer may follow the penalty assessment procedure described in section 16-2-201 for any violation. As part of the county ordinance or resolution authorizing the penalty assessment procedure, the board of county commissioners may adopt a graduated fine schedule for violations pursuant to subsection (5) of this section. The graduated fine schedule may provide for increased penalty assessments for repeat offenses by the same person.

The board of county commissioners may specify in the resolution or ordinance that a massage facility that engages in two or more violations of the resolution or ordinance is a public nuisance, as described in section 16-13-303, unless the violation is already a public nuisance, as described in section 16-13-303. The county attorney of such county, or the district attorney acting pursuant to section 16-13-302, may bring an action in the district court of the county for an injunction against the massage facility that violates the resolution or ordinance.

A massage facility does not include:

Training rooms in public and nonpublic institutions of higher education, as defined in section 23-3.1-102 (5);

Training rooms of recognized professional or amateur athletic teams;

Offices, clinics, or other facilities in which medical professionals licensed by the state of Colorado, or any other state, provide massage services to the public in the ordinary course of the medical profession;

Medical facilities licensed by the state;

Barber shops, beauty salons, and other facilities in which barbers and cosmetologists licensed by the state provide massage services to the public in the ordinary course of the profession;

Bona fide athletic clubs that are not engaged in the practice of providing massage therapy to the members or to the public for remuneration or if an athletic club does not receive more than ten percent of its gross income providing massages to the athletic club's members or to the public;

A place of business where a person offers to perform or performs massage therapy:

For seventy-two hours or less in a six-month period; and

As part of a public or charity event in which the primary purpose is not to provide massage therapy; and

A place of business where a licensed massage therapist practices as a solo practitioner and:

Does not use a business or assumed name; or

Uses a business or assumed name and provides the massage therapist's full legal name or license in each advertisement, and each time the business name or assumed name appears in writing; and

Does not maintain or operate a table shower.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1300), ch. 439, p. 3085, § 1, effective August 10.

30-15-401.5. Fire safety standards.

In addition to any other powers granted by the general assembly, the board of county commissioners of each county has the power to adopt ordinances to provide for minimum fire safety standards which shall be modeled upon those contained in the uniform fire code, including the table of contents, indices, appendices, and tables, as promulgated by the international conference of building officials, the international fire code institute, and the western fire chiefs association.

A board of county commissioners may adopt such ordinances only after it has approved the formation of and received the recommendations of a permanent commission, to be known as the fire code adoption and revision commission. The commission shall consist of the board or its designees, the fire chiefs whose departments or districts lie partially or wholly within the portion of the affected county encompassed by the proposed fire code, and such other members as the board may appoint. Members of the commission appointed by the board shall serve at the pleasure of the board. Members of the commission shall receive no compensation or reimbursement of expenses for their services on the commission.

Such ordinances shall apply to all or a portion of the unincorporated area of the county and any incorporated town or city which elects by ordinance or resolution to have the provisions thereof apply.

A fire protection district or county improvement district providing fire protection services may propose fire code provisions for its district that may be different from the minimum fire safety standards adopted by the county. Such provisions shall be effective within the petitioning fire protection district or county improvement district providing fire protection services only upon the approval of the board.

No fire code provisions adopted pursuant to this section shall apply within any municipality unless the governing body of the municipality adopts a resolution stating that such provisions shall be applicable within its boundaries.

The provisions of subsection (3) of this section shall not apply to farms or ranches.

Fire protection districts organized pursuant to article 1 of title 32, C.R.S., and county improvement districts providing fire protection services organized pursuant to part 5 of article 20 of this title shall enforce the fire safety standards adopted by county ordinances within the fire district's jurisdiction. The county commissioners may contract with an enforcement agency for areas of the county not receiving fire protection.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the validity of any ordinance adopted by a board of county commissioners before July 1, 1985.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a board of county commissioners to provide fire protection services to any area of the county or to require a board of county commissioners to adopt fire safety standards.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no fire protection district shall prohibit the sale of permissible fireworks, as defined in section 24-33.5-2001 (11), within its jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1061, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(4) and (7) amended, p. 1459, § 3, effective March 22.

L. 96:

(1) amended and (10) added, p. 282, § 1, effective April 11.

L. 2007:

(10) amended, p. 493, § 3, effective August 3.

L. 2017:

(10) amended, (SB 17-222), ch. 245, p. 1028, § 5, effective August 9.

30-15-401.7. Determination of fire hazard area - community wildfire protection plans - adoption - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that:

Community wildfire protection plans, or CWPPs, are authorized and defined in section 101 of Title I of the federal "Healthy Forests Restoration Act of 2003", Pub.L. 108-148, referred to in this section as "HFRA". Title I of HFRA authorizes the secretaries of agriculture and the interior to expedite the development and implementation of hazardous fuel reduction projects on federal lands managed by the United States forest service and the bureau of land management when these agencies meet certain conditions. HFRA emphasizes the need for federal agencies to work collaboratively with local communities in developing hazardous fuel reduction projects, placing priority on treatment areas identified by the local communities themselves in a CWPP. The wild land-urban interface area is one of the identified property areas that qualify under HFRA for the use of this expedited environmental review process.

The development of a CWPP can assist a local community in clarifying and refining its priorities for the protection of life, property, and critical infrastructure in its wildland-urban interface area. The CWPP brings together diverse federal, state, and local interests to discuss their mutual concerns for public safety, community sustainability, and natural resources. The CWPP process offers a positive, solution-oriented environment in which to address challenges such as local fire-fighting capability, the need for defensible space around homes and housing developments, and where and how to prioritize land management on both federal and nonfederal lands. CWPPs can be as simple or complex as a local community desires.

The adoption of a CWPP brings many benefits to the state and adopting local community, including:

The opportunity to establish a locally appropriate definition and boundary for the wildland-urban interface area;

The opportunity to study the effect of fire ratings and combustibility standards for building materials used in wildland-urban interface areas;

The establishment of relations with other state and local government officials, local fire chiefs, state and national fire organizations, federal land management agencies, private homeowners, electric, gas, and water utility providers in the subject area, and community groups, thereby ensuring collaboration among these groups in initiating a planning dialogue and facilitating the implementation of priority actions across ownership boundaries;

Specialized natural resource knowledge and technical expertise relative to the planning process, particularly in the areas of global positioning systems and mapping, vegetation management, assessment of values and risks, and funding strategies; and

Statewide leadership in developing and maintaining a list or map of communities at risk within the state and facilitating work among federal and local partners to establish priorities for action.

CWPPs give priority to projects that provide for the protection of at-risk communities or watersheds or that implement recommendations in the CWPP.

CWPPs assist local communities in influencing where and how federal agencies implement fuel reduction projects on federal lands and how additional federal funds may be distributed for projects on nonfederal lands, and in determining the types and methods of treatment that, if completed, would reduce the risk to the community.

The development of CWPPs promotes economic opportunities in rural communities.

By enacting this section, the general assembly intends to facilitate and encourage the development of CWPPs in counties with fire hazard areas in their territorial boundaries and to provide more statewide uniformity and consistency with respect to the content of CWPPs in counties needing protection against wildfires.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"CWPP" means a community wildfire protection plan as authorized and defined in section 101 of Title I of the federal "Healthy Forests Restoration Act of 2003", Pub.L. 108-148.

"Fire hazard area" means an area mapped by the Colorado state forest service, identified in section 23-31-302, C.R.S., as facing a substantial and recurring risk of exposure to severe fire hazards.

Not later than January 1, 2011, the board of county commissioners of each county, with the assistance of the state forester, shall determine whether there are fire hazard areas within the unincorporated portion of the county.

Not later than one hundred eighty days after determining there are fire hazard areas within the unincorporated portion of a county, the board of county commissioners, in collaboration with the representatives of the organizations or entities enumerated in section 23-31-312 (3), C.R.S., that established the guidelines and criteria, shall prepare a CWPP for the purpose of addressing wildfires in fire hazard areas within the unincorporated portion of the county. In preparing the CWPP, the board shall consider the guidelines and criteria established by the state forester and such representatives pursuant to section 23-31-312 (3), C.R.S.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a county that has already prepared a CWPP or an equivalent plan as of August 5, 2009, and, in connection with such preparation, considered the guidelines and criteria established by the state forester and designated representatives pursuant to section 23-31-312 (3), C.R.S., shall not be required to prepare a new CWPP to satisfy the requirements of this section.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-001), ch. 30, p. 125, § 2, effective August 5.

30-15-402. Violations - penalty - surcharges - victim and witness assistance - brain injury trust fund.

Any person who violates any county ordinance adopted pursuant to this part 4 commits a civil infraction or, in the case of traffic offenses, commits a traffic infraction, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars for each separate violation. If authorized by the county ordinance, the penalty assessment procedure provided in section 16-2-201 may be followed by any arresting law enforcement officer for any such violation. As part of said county ordinance authorizing the penalty assessment procedure, the board of county commissioners may adopt a graduated fine schedule for such violations. Such graduated fine schedule may provide for increased penalty assessments for repeat offenses by the same individual. In the case of county traffic ordinance violations, the provisions of sections 42-4-1701 and 42-4-1703, and sections 42-4-1708 to 42-4-1718, shall apply; except that the fine or penalty for a violation charged and the surcharge thereon if authorized by county ordinance shall be paid to the county.

In addition to the penalties prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, persons convicted of a violation of any ordinance adopted pursuant to this part 4 are subject to:

A surcharge of ten dollars that shall be paid to the clerk of the court by the defendant. Each clerk shall transmit the moneys to the court administrator of the judicial district in which the offense occurred for credit to the victims and witnesses assistance and law enforcement fund established in that judicial district pursuant to section

24-4.2-103

, C.R.S.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1012, § 1, effective August 4, 2004.)

In addition to the penalties prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, persons convicted of operating a vehicle in excess of the speed limit in violation of an ordinance adopted pursuant to section 30-15-401 (1)(h) are subject to a surcharge of twenty dollars that shall be paid to the clerk of the court by the defendant. Each clerk shall transmit the money to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the Colorado brain injury trust fund created pursuant to section 26-1-309.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1145, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1449, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1254, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 334, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 367, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1610, § 6, effective January 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(2) amended and (3) added, p. 1012, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2009:

(3) amended, (SB 09-133), ch. 392, p. 2119, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2019:

(3) amended, (HB 19-1147), ch. 178, p. 2033, § 13, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3249, § 505, effective March 1, 2022.

30-15-402.5. Enforcement personnel - peace officer designation.

Personnel designated by ordinance duly adopted to enforce county ordinances adopted pursuant to this part 4, however titled or administratively assigned, may issue citations or summonses and complaints enforcing county ordinances without regard to the certification requirements of part 3 of article 31 of title 24, C.R.S.

Nothing in this section is intended to vest authority in any person so engaged to enforce any resolution or ordinance through execution of an administrative entry and seizure warrant issued pursuant to section 30-15-401 or through exercise of any power other than the power to issue a citation or summons and complaint as described in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1241, § 14, effective May 22.

30-15-403. Style of ordinances.

The style of the ordinances in counties shall be: "Be it ordained by the board of county commissioners of .......... county."

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1145, § 1, effective May 24.

30-15-404. Majority must vote for ordinances - proving ordinances.

All ordinances shall require for their passage or adoption the concurrence of a majority of the board of county commissioners. All ordinances may be proven by the seal of the county, and, when printed in book or pamphlet form and purporting to be printed and published by authority of the county, the same shall be received in evidence in all courts and places without further proof.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1145, § 1, effective May 24.

30-15-405. Record and publication of ordinances.

All ordinances, as soon as may be after their adoption, shall be recorded in a book kept for that purpose and shall be authenticated by the signatures of the chairman of the board of county commissioners and the county clerk and recorder. All ordinances of a general or permanent nature and those imposing any fine, penalty, or forfeiture, following adoption, shall be published by title only and shall contain the date of the initial publication and shall reprint in full any section, subsection, or paragraph of the ordinance which was amended following the initial publication. Publication following adoption may be in full at the discretion of the board of county commissioners. It is a sufficient defense to any suit or prosecution for such fine, penalty, or forfeiture to show that no publication was made. If there is no newspaper published or having a general circulation within the limits of the county, then, upon a resolution being passed by the board of county commissioners to that effect, ordinances may be published by posting copies thereof in three public places within the limits of the county, to be designated by the board of county commissioners. Except for ordinances calling for special elections or necessary to the immediate preservation of the public health or safety and containing the reasons making the same necessary in a separate section, such ordinances shall not take effect and be in force before thirty days after they have been so published. The excepted ordinances shall take effect upon adoption. A copy of an appropriate section or sections of the book of ordinances provided for in this section, certified as correct by the county clerk and recorder, shall be taken and considered in all courts of this state as prima facie evidence that such ordinances have been published as provided by law.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1145, § 1, effective May 24.

30-15-406. Reading before board of county commissioners - publication.

No ordinance shall be adopted by any board of county commissioners of any county in this state unless the same has been previously introduced and read at a preceding regular or special meeting of such board and published in full in one newspaper of general circulation published in such county at least ten days before its adoption. If there is no such newspaper published in the county, copies of the proposed ordinance shall be posted in at least six public places in such county at least ten days prior to its adoption. Such previous introduction of such ordinance at such preceding meeting of the board of county commissioners and the fact of its publication in such newspapers or by posting shall appear in the certificate and the attestation of the county clerk and recorder on such ordinance after its adoption.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1146, § 1, effective May 24.

30-15-407. Reading - adoption of code.

Whenever the reading of an ordinance or of a code, which is to be adopted by reference, is required by statute, any such requirement shall be deemed to be satisfied if the title of the proposed ordinance or code is read and the entire text of the proposed ordinance or of any code which is to be adopted by reference is submitted in writing to the board of county commissioners before adoption.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1146, § 1, effective May 24.

30-15-408. Disposition of fines and forfeitures.

All fines and forfeitures for the violation of ordinances and, except as otherwise provided for surcharges levied pursuant to section 30-15-402 (2) and (3), all moneys collected for licenses or otherwise shall be paid into the treasury of the county at such times and in such manner as may be prescribed by ordinance, or, if there is no ordinance referring to the case, it shall be paid to the treasurer at once.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1146, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1254, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1013, § 2, effective August 4.

30-15-409. One-year limitation of suits.

All suits for the recovery of any fine and prosecutions for the commission of any offense made punishable under any ordinance of any county shall be barred one year after the commission of the offense for which the fine is sought to be recovered.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1146, § 1, effective May 24.

30-15-410. County courts - jurisdiction.

County courts, in their respective counties, have jurisdiction in prosecutions of violations of county ordinances. The simplified county court procedures set forth in part 1 of article 2 of title 16, C.R.S., and the penalty assessment procedures set forth in part 2 of said article shall be applicable to the prosecution of violations of county ordinances. Any summons and complaint brought in any county court shall be filed in the name of the county by and on behalf of the people of the state of Colorado. Any process issued from a county court shall be likewise denominated. It is the duty of the sheriff and undersheriff and deputies, in their respective counties, to enforce the provisions of county ordinances.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1147, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1449, § 2, effective May 22.

Cross references:

For the jurisdiction of the county court generally, see §§ 13-6-103 through 13-6-106.

30-15-411. Conflicts with state statutes.

No county shall adopt an ordinance that is in conflict with any state statute.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1147, § 1, effective May 24.